Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 4. HEALTH FACILITIES

SUBTITLE F. POWERS AND DUTIES OF HOSPITALS

CHAPTER 316. ESTABLISHMENT OF HEALTH CARE COLLABORATIVES

Sec. 316.001. AUTHORITY TO ESTABLISH HEALTH CARE COLLABORATIVE. A public hospital created under Subtitle C or D or a hospital district created under general or special law may form and sponsor a nonprofit health care collaborative that is certified under Chapter 848, Insurance Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 7), Sec. 4.04, eff. September 28, 2011.